New York, session 2025-2026, A4329.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The Metropolitan Transportation Authority shall, in 2 consultation with the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey and the 3 state Department of Transportation, conduct a study to explore the use 4 of the Triboro rail line as a co-mingled public transit and freight 5 line, exploring the reduction of travel time for residents and an 6 increase in quality of life for outer borough residents. 7 2. The study shall cover the full extent of the corridor which 8 includes Amtrak's ownership in the Bronx south over the Hell Gate 9 bridge, CSX's Fremont Secondary line south to Fresh Pond Junction, and 10 the Long Island Rail Road's Bay Ridge branch operated by New York and 11 Atlantic Railway. 12 3. Such study shall examine the challenges, opportunities, and feasi- 13 bility of co-mingling public transit and freight service along the 14 Triboro rail line. 15 4. Within one year of the effective date of this act, the Metropolitan 16 Transportation Authority shall issue a report of its findings on the 17 feasibility and benefits of co-mingling public transit and freight 18 service along the Triboro rail line to the governor, the temporary pres- 19 ident of the senate and the speaker of the assembly of the state of New 20 York. Such report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 21 (a) the populations served and ridership expected to benefit from 22 public transit on the Triboro rail line; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04933-01-5 A. 4329 2 1 (b) the potential transit travel time reductions, greenhouse gas 2 reductions, and economic benefits expected from the public transit 3 service on the Triboro rail line; 4 (c) the locations of potential stations, frequency and span of service 5 expected to run daily along the Triboro rail line; 6 (d) the operational segments (in phases) to get service started; sche- 7 dules needed for co-mingling with freight; expected freight expansion 8 and impacts to service; and 9 (e) any actions that can be implemented by the Metropolitan Transpor- 10 tation Authority immediately, a plan of action for such implementation, 11 and the estimated cost of such implementation plan. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.